Utah statutes.
78B-15-313.   Adoption of rules.

The Office of Vital Records may adopt rules in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, to implement this part.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

